Maryland, session 2025, HB1099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1099*

HOUSE BILL 1099
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
11–113.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “GROSS NEGLIGENCE” MEANS DISREGARD FOR THE
RIGHTS OR SAFETY OF OTHERS, INCLUDING THE PUBLIC AT LARGE, THAT:
(1) THE ACTOR KNOWS OR SHOULD KNOW IS LIKELY TO CAUSE HARM;
AND
(2) IS CHARACTERIZED BY:
(I) A FAILURE TO EXERCISE EVEN SLIGHT CARE;
(II) WILLFUL, WANTON, OR OUTRAGEOUS MISCONDUCT;
(III) A PATTERN OF REPEATED MISCONDUCT;
(IV) MALICIOUS, OPPRESSIVE, OR FRAUDULENT INTENT;
(V) ACTS OR OMISSIONS THAT CREATE A HIGH DEGREE OF RISK
OR HARM TO OTHERS; OR
(VI) CONDUCT THAT DEMONSTRATES INDIFFERENCE TO LEGAL
OBLIGATIONS OR THE CONSEQUENCES OF MISCONDUCT.
(B) PUNITIVE DAMAGES MAY BE AWARDED IN A CIVIL ACTION ALLEGING
NEGLIGENCE ONLY IF THE PLAINTIFF PROVES BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING
EVIDENCE THAT THE DEFENDANT ACTED WITH GROSS NEGLIGENCE.
(C) THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR SHALL ASSESS A SURCHARGE ON
PUNITIVE DAMAGES IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 50% OF AN AWARD OF PUNITIVE
DAMAGES, WHICH SHALL BE:
(1) PAID BY THE DEFENDANT AGAINST WHOM THE JUDGMENT FOR
PUNITIVE DAMAGES IS ENTERED; AND
(2) DEPOSITED INTO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE
FUND UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(D) (1) THE SURCHARGE ON PUNITIVE DAMAGES UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION:

HOUSE BILL 1099 3
(I) IS AN ADDITIONAL PAYMENT THAT A DEFENDANT SHALL
MAKE TO THE STATE THAT MAY NOT IN ANY WAY IMPACT THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
PUNITIVE DAMAGES A DEFENDANT IS ORDERED TO PAY A PLAINTIFF; AND
(II) MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PENALIZE A PLAINTIFF WHO
HAS BEEN AWARDED PUNITIVE DAMAGES.
(2) A JURY MAY NOT BE INFORMED OF THE SURCHARGE ON PUNITIVE
DAMAGES THAT A DEFENDANT IS REQUIRED TO PAY UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
(3) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE SURCHARGE ON A PUNITIVE
DAMAGES AWARD THAT A DEFENDANT IS REQUIRED TO PAY SHALL BE ASSESSED AT
THE CONCLUSION OF ALL PROCEEDINGS RELATING TO THE CIVIL ACTION.
Article – Education
5–206.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund.
(b) There is the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Revenue distributed to the Fund under § 11–113 OF THE COURTS
ARTICLE, Title 9, Subtitles 1D and 1E of the State Government Article, and §§ 2–4A–02,
2–605.1, and 2–1303 of the Tax – General Article;
(2) Money appropriated in the State budget for the Fund; and
(3) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that this Act be applied and interpreted to abrogate the holding establishing the
punitive damages criteria in Owens–Illinois, Inc. v. Zenobia, 325 Md. 420 (1992).
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any action for punitive damages filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.